Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2249.04
Transferred employees; benefits.

Accrued leave and benefits for separate juvenile court probation employees and municipal court employees who have become state employees pursuant to law shall be subject to this section.

(1) The city or county shall transfer all accrued sick leave of such employees up to the maximum number of accumulated hours for sick leave allowed by the state for state probation officers and the city or county shall reimburse the state in an amount equal to twenty-five percent of the value of such accrued sick leave hours based on the straight-time rate of pay for the employee. For any accrued sick leave hours of an employee which are in excess of the amount that can be transferred, the city or county shall reimburse the employee for twenty-five percent of the value of the sick leave hours based on the straight-time rate of pay for the employee.

(2) The transferred employee may transfer the maximum amount of accrued annual leave earned as an employee of the city or county allowed by the state. The city or county shall reimburse the state in an amount equal to one hundred percent of the value of the hours of accrued annual leave transferred. The city or county shall reimburse the transferred employee in an amount equal to one hundred percent of the hours of any accrued annual leave in excess of the amount which may be transferred based on the employee's straight-time rate of pay at the time of transfer.

(3) Any employee transferred to the Office of Probation Administration shall not lose any accrual rate value for his or her sick leave or vacation leave as a result of such transfer. The employee may use each year's service with the city or county as credit in qualifying for accrual rates with the state's sick leave and vacation leave programs.

(4) When accrued sick leave and vacation leave for a transferred employee are at a greater rate value than allowed by the state's sick leave and vacation leave plans, the city or county shall pay to the state on July 1, 1985, an amount equal to the difference between the value of such benefits allowed by the city or county and by the state based on, at the time of transfer, twenty-five percent of the employee's straight-time rate of pay for the sick leave and one hundred percent of the employee's straight-time rate of pay for vacation leave. The state may receive reimbursement based on such difference in rate values not later than July 1, 1990.

(5) The transferred employee shall not receive any additional accrual rate value for state benefits until the employee meets the qualifications for the increased accrual rates pursuant to the state's requirements.

(6) The transferred employee shall participate in and be covered by the Nebraska State Insurance Program, sections 84-1601 to 84-1615, on July 1, 1985.

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 64;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 34.

Municipal court, transfer of duties, see sections 24-515 and 24-593.